Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-970
Water service districts; establishment; ordinance.

The governing body of any city of the second class or village shall have power, by ordinance, (1) to lay out the city or village into suitable districts for the purpose of establishing a system of water service districts, (2) to provide water service systems and regulate the construction, repair, and use of the water service systems, (3) to compel all proper connections with the water service system and branches from other streets, avenues, and alleys, and from private property, and (4) to provide a penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars for any obstruction or injury to any water main or part thereof, or for failure to comply with the regulations prescribed therefor. No such improvements shall be ordered except as provided in sections 17-971 and 17-972.

Laws 1967, c. 73, § 1, p. 237;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 301.